New York, session 2025-2026, S6413.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The public health law is amended by adding a new article 2 20-C to read as follows: 3 ARTICLE 20-C 4 STATE AMYOTROPHIC LATERAL SCLEROSIS AND MOTOR NEURON DISEASE 5 REGISTRY 6 Section 2020. Definitions. 7 2021. Duty to report. 8 2022. Establishment of registry. 9 2023. Duties of the department. 10 2024. Duties of the commissioner. 11 § 2020. Definitions. As used in this article, the following terms 12 shall have the following meanings: 13 1. "ALS" means amyotrophic lateral sclerosis, a neurological disorder 14 that affects motor neurons, the nerve cells in the brain and spinal cord 15 that control voluntary muscle movement and breathing. 16 2. "MND" means motor neuron disease, a group of progressive neurologi- 17 cal disorders that destroy motor neurons, the cells that control skele- 18 tal muscle activity such as walking, breathing, speaking, and swallow- 19 ing. This group includes diseases such as amyotrophic lateral 20 sclerosis, progressive bulbar palsy, primary lateral sclerosis, progres- 21 sive muscular atrophy, spinal muscular atrophy, Kennedy's disease, and 22 post-polio syndrome. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD10901-01-5 S. 6413 2 1 § 2021. Duty to report. 1. Every physician, nurse practitioner, physi- 2 cian assistant and general hospital that diagnoses or is treating a 3 patient diagnosed with ALS or MND shall give notice no later than one 4 hundred eighty days of each case of ALS or MND coming under their care, 5 to the department, in a format to be determined by the commissioner, 6 except as otherwise provided in this article. 7 2. All patients diagnosed with ALS or MND shall be provided with writ- 8 ten and verbal notice regarding the collection of information and 9 patient data on ALS and MND. Patients who do not wish to participate in 10 the collection of data shall affirmatively opt out in writing after 11 ample opportunity to review such notice, provided that the mere inci- 12 dence of a patient with ALS or MND shall be the sole required informa- 13 tion for the registry under section two thousand twenty-two of this 14 article for any patient who chooses not to participate. 15 § 2022. Establishment of registry. 1. The department shall establish 16 an ALS and MND registry for the collection of information on the inci- 17 dence and prevalence of ALS and MND. The department may consult with ALS 18 and MND experts, including neurologists, patients living with ALS and 19 MND, and ALS and MND researchers to assist in the development and imple- 20 mentation of such registry, and to determine what data shall be 21 collected. 22 2. All information maintained by the department under the provisions 23 of this section shall be confidential except as necessary to carry out 24 the provisions of this section and shall not be released for any other 25 purpose. 26 3. The department may enter into an agreement to provide data 27 collected in the ALS and MND registry to the federal centers for disease 28 control and prevention, or successor agency, to local health officers, 29 or health researchers for the study of ALS and MND for public health and 30 research purposes. Data shall be provided in summary, statistical, 31 aggregate, or other form such that no individual person can be identi- 32 fied. 33 4. On or before January first, two thousand twenty-seven, the depart- 34 ment shall create and maintain a public website called the "New York 35 state ALS and MN Disease registry" which shall include information on 36 the incidence and prevalence of ALS and MND in the state by county, and 37 demographic information on affected patients. 38 § 2023. Duties of the department. 1. ALS and MND reports and data 39 shall be maintained by the department in a manner suitable for research 40 purposes and shall be made available to people as set forth in section 41 two thousand twenty-two of this article. 42 2. All information collection under this article shall be confidential 43 insofar as the identity of individual patients is concerned and shall be 44 used solely for the purposes as provided in this article. Access to such 45 information shall be limited to authorized employees of the department 46 as well as persons and organizations identified in section two thousand 47 twenty-two of this article with valid scientific interest and qualifica- 48 tions, as determined by the commissioner, who are engaged in demograph- 49 ic, epidemiological, or other similar studies related to public health. 50 3. The department shall maintain an accurate record of all people who 51 are given access to the information contained in the ALS and MND regis- 52 try. Such a record shall include the name of the person authorizing 53 access, the name, title and organizational affiliation of persons given 54 access, dates of access, and the specific purposes for which information 55 is to be used. S. 6413 3 1 4. Any person who, in violation of a written agreement to maintain 2 confidentiality, discloses any information provided under this article, 3 or who uses information provided under this article in a manner other 4 than that prescribed by the commissioner, may be denied further access 5 to any confidential information maintained by the department. 6 § 2024. Duties of the commissioner. The commissioner may promulgate 7 any regulations necessary to implement the provisions of this article, 8 including but not limited to: 9 1. Establishing the form, content, and manner by which providers shall 10 report ALS and MND information into the registry established under 11 section two thousand twenty-two of this article; 12 2. Prescribing the permissible uses for the information made available 13 under this article; and 14 3. Establishing procedures to maintain confidentiality of information 15 collected by providers and provided to members of the department pursu- 16 ant to this article. This shall include a procedure to ensure that 17 confidential patient information is deidentified prior to being provided 18 to authorized participants under this article. 19 § 2. This act shall take effect on the ninetieth day after it shall 20 have become a law. Effective immediately, the addition, amendment and/or 21 repeal of any rule or regulation necessary for the implementation of 22 this act on its effective date are authorized to be made and completed 23 on or before such effective date.